Maryland, session 2025, HB0061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–331.
FOR EACH CONSTRUCTION PROJECT OR MAJOR RENOVATION PROJECT OF A
PUBLIC SCHOOL BUILDING PROPOSED AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2025, THAT INCLUDES
THE CONSTRUCTION OR RENOVATION OF A SCHOOL PARKING LOT, THE STATE
SHALL REQUIRE THAT THE PROJECT BE DESIGNED, ENGINEERED, AND
CONSTRUCTED IN A MANNER SO THAT THE PARKING LOT IS EQUIPPED WITH THE
APPROPRIATE UNDERGROUND INFRASTRUCTURE NECESSARY TO SUPPORT SOLAR
CANOPY INSTALLATION.
5–319.
(a) The Interagency Commission shall adopt regulations that require the design
development documents for the construction or major renovation of school buildings
submitted by a county board to the Interagency Commission to include:
(1) An evaluation of the use of solar technologies, including photovoltaic or
solar water heating AND PARKING LOT SOLAR CANOPIES, based on life cycle costs; and
(2) If an evaluation determines that solar technologies are not appropriate
for a construction or major renovation project, a report that explains why the use of the
technology is not appropriate.
(b) On or before December 31 of each year, the Interagency Commission shall
submit a report on the number of public school construction and major renovation projects
in each jurisdiction that use solar technologies to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.